Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8525.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
44-5-20.30. Coventry -- Property tax classification, levy determination and valuation.
(a) The assessor of the town of Coventry, on or before June 1 of each year, shall make full
and fair cash valuation of each property class as identified in subsection (b) of this section and
notwithstanding the provisions of § 44-5-11.8 to the contrary, determine the percentage of the tax
levy to be apportioned each class of property and shall apply tax rates sufficient to produce the
proportion of the total tax levy.
(b) Classes of property.
(1) Class 1. Residential real estate consisting of no more than five (5) dwelling units; land
classified as open space; and dwellings on leased land including mobile homes.
(2) Class 2. Commercial and industrial real estate; residential properties containing partial
commercial or business uses; and residential real estate of more than five (5) dwelling units.
(3) Class 3. All ratable tangible personal property excluding motor vehicles and trailers
subject in all respects to the requirements of § 44-5.3-3.
44-5-20.31. Coventry -- Property tax classification -- Tax levy determination.
The assessor shall provide to the town council a list containing the full and fair valuation
of each property class, and with the approval of the town council, annually determine the percentage
of the tax levy to be apportioned each class of property and shall annually apply tax rates sufficient

to produce the proportion of the total tax levy.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect retroactively to December 31, 2025.
========
LC006407
========
LC006407 - Page 2 of 3